Tennessee statutes. Title 20 Civil Procedure
Part 5

Deliberation and Verdict

20-9-501. Charge to jury in writing.

On the trial of all civil cases, it is the duty of the judge before whom the civil case is tried, at the request of either party, plaintiff or defendant, to reduce every word of the judge's charge to the jury to writing before it is delivered to the jury, and all subsequent instructions that may be asked for by the jury, or that may be given by the judge, shall, in like manner, be reduced to writing before being delivered to the jury.

Acts 1875, ch. 37, § 1; Shan., § 4683; Code 1932, § 8809; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1315.

Cross-References. Instructions to jury, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 51, Tenn. R. Crim. P. 30.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 211.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 11 Tenn. Juris., Equity, § 73; 15 Tenn. Juris., Instructions, §§ 6, 17.

Law Reviews.

Jury Reform in Tennessee, 34 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1 (2003).

Waiting for the Jury (George W. Jenkins III), 20 No. 4 Tenn. B.J. 31 (1984).

20-9-502. Verdict applied to good count.

If any counts in a declaration are good, a verdict for entire damages shall be applied to such good counts.

Code 1858, § 2969 (deriv. Acts 1801, ch. 6, § 63); Shan., § 4694; Code 1932, § 8824; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1317.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 24 Tenn. Juris., Verdict, §§ 2, 11.

Law Reviews.

General Verdicts in Multi-Claim Litigation, 21 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 705 (1991).

Cited: Hager v. Hager, 17 Tenn. App. 143, 66 S.W.2d 250, 1933 Tenn. App. LEXIS 51 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1933); Wilson v. Moudy, 22 Tenn. App. 356, 123 S.W.2d 828, 1938 Tenn. App. LEXIS 36 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1938); Summers v. Bond-Chadwell Co., 24 Tenn. App. 357, 145 S.W.2d 7, 1939 Tenn. App. LEXIS 17 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1939); Isaacs v. Bokor, 566 S.W.2d 532, 1978 Tenn. LEXIS 555 (Tenn. 1978); Helton v. Reynolds, 640 S.W.2d 5, 1982 Tenn. App. LEXIS 385 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1982); Womack v. Gettelfinger, 808 F.2d 446, 1986 U.S. App. LEXIS 36318 (6th Cir. Tenn. 1986); West v. Media Gen. Operations, Inc., 250 F. Supp. 2d 923, 2002 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 26334 (E.D. Tenn. 2002).

20-9-503. Scope of general verdict.

A general verdict, although it may not in terms answer every issue joined, is nevertheless held to embrace every issue, unless exception is taken at the term at which the verdict is rendered.

Code 1858, § 4247 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 152, § 4); Shan., § 6085; Code 1932, § 10343; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1318.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 232; 24 Tenn. Juris., Verdict, §§ 2, 11, 13.

Law Reviews.

Procedure and Evidence — 1954 Tennessee Survey, 7 Vand. L. Rev. 895.

Cited: Osborne v. Frazor, 58 Tenn. App. 15, 425 S.W.2d 768, 1968 Tenn. App. LEXIS 292, 35 A.L.R.3d 338 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1968); Clinard v. Pennington, 59 Tenn. App. 128, 438 S.W.2d 748, 1968 Tenn. App. LEXIS 336 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1968); In re Pitner, 696 F.2d 447, 1982 U.S. App. LEXIS 23050 (6th Cir. Tenn. 1982); Hill v. Doe, — S.W.3d —, 2008 Tenn. App. LEXIS 396 (Tenn. Ct. App. June 30, 2008).

20-9-504. Value omitted from verdict.

If the verdict in an action for specific personal property omits to find the value of the articles, the court may award a writ of inquiry to ascertain the value.

Code 1858, § 4248 (deriv. Acts 1801, ch. 6, § 62); Shan., § 6086; Code 1932, § 10344; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1319.

20-9-505. Verdict for part of property.

If, on an issue embracing several articles, the verdict is for part only, it is not error, but the title or claim to those articles omitted is barred.

Code 1858, § 4249; Shan., § 6087; Code 1932, § 10345; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1320.

20-9-506. Time for decision in nonjury cases.

When any judge of any district tries a case without the intervention of a jury, whether the judge is required to reduce the judge's finding of facts to writing or not, the judge shall be required to render the judge's decision and have judgment entered in the case within sixty (60) days from the completion of the trial.

Acts 1903, ch. 441, § 1; Shan., § 6087a1; Code 1932, § 10347; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 10347; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1322.

Cross-References. Findings and judgment, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 52, 54, 58.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in Rule 11, § III of the Rules of the Supreme Court of Tennessee.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, § 45.

Law Reviews.

Changes in Procedure Under the Proposed Supplement to the 1932 Code of Tennessee, 21 Tenn. L. Rev. 589.

Ethical Obligations of Judges (Joe G. Riley), 23 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 507 (1993).

Cited: Bennett v. Stutts, 521 S.W.2d 575, 1975 Tenn. LEXIS 689 (Tenn. 1975); Justice v. Sovran Bank, 918 S.W.2d 428, 1995 Tenn. App. LEXIS 754 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1995).

20-9-507. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §20-9-507 (Acts 1903, ch. 441, § 2; Shan., § 6087a2; Code 1932, § 10348; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 10348; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1323), concerning appeals from nonjury cases was repealed by Acts 1981, ch. 449, § 1(3). For present provisions, see T.R.A.P. 21.

20-9-508. Poll of jury on request.

The trial judges in all courts of record in which suits are tried by juries, in both criminal and civil cases, shall be required to poll the jury on application of either the state or the defendant in criminal cases and either the plaintiff or the defendant in civil cases, without exception.

Acts 1955, ch. 239, § 1; T.C.A., § 20-1324.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 31.36.

Law Reviews.

Civil Procedure — Polling the Jury — Harmless Error, 37 Tenn. L. Rev. 96.

Cited: State v. Stephens, 264 S.W.3d 719, 2007 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 748 (Tenn. Crim. App. Sept. 21, 2007).

20-9-509. Poll of jury in open court — Persons present.

The juries shall not be polled otherwise than in open court.

In felony cases they shall not be polled unless the defendant is present in open court.

In all other cases, the respective parties, either the state or the defendant in criminal cases or the plaintiff or the defendant in civil cases, may waive their presence at the time the jury is polled.

Acts 1955, ch. 239, § 2; T.C.A., § 20-1325.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 31.36.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 24 Tenn. Juris., Verdict, § 26.

Cited: Nance v. State, 210 Tenn. 328, 358 S.W.2d 327, 1962 Tenn. LEXIS 443 (1962); Lovell v. McCullough, 222 Tenn. 567, 439 S.W.2d 105, 1969 Tenn. LEXIS 463 (1969).

20-9-510. Submission of exhibits to jury.

The trial judge in civil cases may, in the judge's discretion, on motion of either party, upon the judge's own motion or on request by the jury, submit all exhibits admitted in evidence to the jury for the jury's consideration during deliberations on the jury's verdict.

Acts 1976, ch. 792, § 1; T.C.A., § 20-1332.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Tenn. R. Evid. 803.

This section is referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Tenn. R. Crim. P. 30.1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), §§ 24.51, 31.14.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 11 Tenn. Juris., Evidence, § 82.

Tennessee Law of Evidence (2nd ed., Cohen, Paine and Sheppeard), § 401.15; Rule 803(5); § 803(5).3.

Law Reviews.

The Federal Influence on the Tennessee Hearsay Rule (Alfred H. Knight, III), 57 Tenn. L. Rev. 117 (1989).